2018-komp-ling/practicals/finite-state-transducers/chv.twol
Alphabet
  а ӑ е ё ӗ и о у ӳ ы э ю я б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ
  А Ă Е Ё Ӗ И О У Ӳ Ы Э Ю Я Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н П Р С Ҫ Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Й Ь Ъ 
 %{A%}:а %{A%}:е %{Ă%}:ӑ %{Ă%}:ӗ %{Ă%}:0 %{м%}:м %{м%}:0
 %{э%}:0 %{л%}:0 %{с%}:0 %{а%}:0 %{ъ%} %{Т%}:т %{Т%}:р
 %{л%}:н %{л%}:л %{л%}:р
;

Sets

BackVow = ӑ а ы о у я ё ю %{ъ%};

FrontVow = е ӗ э и ӳ ; 

Vowels = е ӗ э и ӳ ӑ а ы о у я ё ю ;

Cns = б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ ; 

ArchiCns = %{м%} ;


Rules 

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A}"
%{A%}:а <=> BackVow: [ Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ;

"%{Ă%}:0 if there is previous %{м%}: or a vowel and, optionally, a following н"

%{Ă%}:0 <=> %{м%}: %>:  _ н ;
	    Vowels: %>: _ ; 

"%{м%}:0 if there is a following %{Ă%}: followed by н"

%{м%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{Ă%}: н ;


"%{Ă%}:ӑ or %{Ă%}:ӗ according to vowel harmony if previous consonant"

%{Ă%}:ӑ <=> BackVow: [ ArchiCns: | Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ;
        except
                                     %{м%}: %>:  _ н ;
				     Vowels: %>: _ ; 
"Ablative - choosing р or т"
%{Т%}:т <=> %{л%}: %>: _ ;




! a:b   CONSTRAINT_OPERATOR   LEFT_CONTEXT   _   RIGHT_CONTEXT ;
